en: Crackers(Breakfast), Breakfast crackers
fr: Biscuits crackers, Crackers
nl: Crackers (ontbijt), Ontbijtcrackers

en: Crackers (Appetizers), Crackers(Appetizers)
bg: Крекери
ca: Galetes salades
da: Crackers
de: Crackers
es: Crackers
fi: suolaiset keksit
fr: Biscuits apéritifs, biscuits pour l'apéritif, gâteaux pour l'apéritif, Gâteaux apéritifs, Biscuits salés, Crackers salés
he: קרקרים
hr: Krekeri
hu: Krékerek
it: Crackers
ja: クラッカー
nl: Crackers
ru: Солёное печенье
sv: Crackers
zh: 饼干（开胃食品）

en: Small Crackers
hr: Mali krekeri
it: Scrocchi
nl: Toastjes

en: Wheat crackers
bg: Пшенични крекери
fr: Crackers au froment, Biscuits apéritifs au froment
hr: Pšenični krekeri

en: Rice crackers
bg: Оризови крекери
fr: Biscuits apéritifs au riz

en: Plain salty snacks, Plain salty crackers
fr: Biscuits apéritifs nature, Crackers nature

en: Salty canistrelli
fr: Canistrelli salés

en: Cheese puff pastries
fr: Biscuits Feuilletés auf fromage
hr: Lisnato pecivo sa sirom
nl: Kaasvlinders

en: Cheese doodles
hr: Crteži sa sirom
nl: Kaasflips
ro: Pufuleți cu brânză

en: Salted crispy crepe with cheese
fr: Crêpes dentelle au fromage, Crêpe dentelle pour apéritif au fromage

en: Pretzel, Mini pretzels
ar: عقدية, :مخبوزات
az: Bretzel
be: Брэцаль
bg: Брецел, солети
br: Bretzel
ca: Pretzel
cs: Preclík
da: Brezel
de: Brezeln, Brezel
el: Μπρέτσελ
eo: Krakeno, :Breco
es: Bretzel
et: Vesikringel
eu: Pretzel
fa: پرتزل
fi: Brezel, Pretzel
fr: Bretzels, Mini bretzels
gl: Pretzel
he: בייגלה, כעכים, ביגלה, פרצעל, כעך
hr: Perec
hu: Perec
hy: Բրեցել
id: Pretzel
it: Brezel, Bretzel
ja: プレッツェル
jv: Pretzel
ka: ბრეცელი
ko: 브레첼
la: Panis quadragesimalis
lb: Bretzel
mk: Перек
ms: Pretzel
nl: Pretzels, Pretzel
pl: Precel
pt: Bretzel
ru: Брецель
sh: Pereca
sk: Praclík
sr: Pereca
th: เพรตเซล
tr: Pretzel
uk: Брецель
ur: پریٹزل
vi: Brezel
yi: פרעצל
zh: 椒鹽卷餅

en: Salty flaky biscuits
fr: Biscuits apéritifs feuilletés, Biscuit apéritif feuilleté

en: Salty palmiers
fr: Palmiers salés
nl: Gezouten vlinders, Gezouten palmiers

en: Salty snacks with reduced fat, Crackers with reduced fat
fr: Biscuits apéritifs allégés, Biscuits apéritifs nature allégés en matière grasse, Crackers nature allégés en matière grasse

en: Salty sesame snacks
fr: Biscuits apéritifs au sésame

en: Salty snacks crackers garnished with cheese, Salty snacks crackers filled with cheese
fr: Biscuits apéritifs fourrés au fromage, Biscuits apéritifs crackers garnis au fromage, Biscuits apéritifs crackers fourrés au fromage

en: Puffed salty snacks, Salty snacks puff pastry
fr: Snacks apéritifs soufflés, Biscuits apéritifs soufflés, Gâteaux apéritifs soufflés
hr: Napuhane slane grickalice
ro: Pufuleți

en: Puffed salty snacks made from maize, Puffed salty snacks made from corn
fr: Snacks apéritifs soufflés à base de maïs, Biscuits apéritifs soufflés à base de maïs

en: Puffed salty snacks made from maize with peanuts, Puffed salty snacks made from corn with peanuts
fr: Snacks apéritifs soufflés à base de maïs à la cacahuète, Biscuit apéritif soufflé à base de maïs à la cacahuète

en: Puffed salty snacks made from potato
fr: Snacks apéritifs soufflés à base de pomme de terre, Biscuits apéritifs soufflés à base de pomme de terre, Biscuits apéritifs soufflés à base de pomme de terre type Monster Munch, Monster Munch